Maryland, session 2026, HB0130.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Courts and Judicial Proceedings
5–106.
(KK) A PROSECUTION FOR A VIOLATION OF § 8–906(C) OF THE CRIMINAL
LAW ARTICLE SHALL BE INSTITUTED WITHIN 1 YEAR AFTER THE VICTIM OF THE
OFFENSE KNEW OR REASONABLY SHOULD HAVE KNOWN THAT THE FRAUD
OCCURRED.
Article – Criminal Law
8–601.
(a) A person, with intent to defraud another, may not counterfeit, cause to be
counterfeited, or willingly aid or assist in counterfeiting any:
(1) bond;
(2) check;
(3) [deed;
(4)] draft;
[(5)] (4) endorsement or assignment of a bond, draft, check, or promissory
note;
[(6)] (5) entry in an account book or ledger;
[(7)] (6) letter of credit;
[(8)] (7) negotiable instrument;
[(9)] (8) power of attorney;
[(10)] (9) promissory note;
[(11)] (10) release or discharge for money or property;
[(12)] (11) title to a motor vehicle;
[(13)] (12) waiver or release of mechanics’ lien; or

HOUSE BILL 130
[(14)] (13) will or codicil.
(b) A person may not knowingly, willfully, and with fraudulent intent possess a
counterfeit of any of the items listed in subsection (a) of this section.
(c) (1) A person who violates subsection (a) of this section is guilty of a felony
and on conviction is subject to imprisonment not exceeding 10 years or a fine not exceeding
$1,000 or both.
(2) A person who violates subsection (b) of this section is guilty of a
misdemeanor and on conviction is subject to imprisonment not exceeding 3 years or a fine
not exceeding $1,000 or both.
(d) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the prosecution of an alleged
violation of this section or for an alleged violation of a crime based on an act that establishes
a violation of this section may be commenced in any county in which:
(1) an element of the crime occurred;
(2) the [deed or other] alleged counterfeit instrument is recorded in the
county land records, filed with the clerk of the circuit court, or filed with the register of
wills;
(3) the victim resides; or
(4) if the victim is not an individual, the victim conducts business.
8–906.
(A) A PERSON, WITH INTENT TO DEFRAUD ANOTHER, MAY NOT:
(1) CLAIM TO SELL OR CONVEY OR ATTEMPT TO SELL OR CONVEY
REAL PROPERTY THAT THE GRANTOR DOES NOT OWN;
(2) CLAIM TO SELL OR CONVEY OR ATTEMPT TO SELL OR CONVEY
REAL PROPERTY THAT THE GRANTOR LACKS SUFFICIENT AUTHORITY TO TRANSFER;
(3) CLAIM TO LEASE OR ATTEMPT TO LEASE REAL PROPERTY THAT
BELONGS TO ANOTHER;
(4) OBTAIN OR ATTEMPT TO OBTAIN, OR SELL OR CONVEY, OR
ATTEMPT TO SELL OR CONVEY THE REAL PROPERTY OF ANOTHER THROUGH THE
EXECUTION OF A DEED BY THE RIGHTFUL OWNER OF THE PROPERTY BY DECEPTION,
INTIMIDATION, THREAT, OR UNDUE INFLUENCE;

HOUSE BILL 130 5
(5) COUNTERFEIT A DEED OR CAUSE A DEED TO BE COUNTERFEITED;
OR
(6) RECORD A DEED OR CAUSE A DEED TO BE RECORDED IN
FURTHERANCE OF A VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION.
(B) A PERSON MAY NOT AID OR ASSIST ANOTHER IN A VIOLATION OF
SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION.
(C) A PERSON MAY NOT KNOWINGLY, WILLFULLY, AND WITH FRAUDULENT
INTENT POSSESS A COUNTERFEIT DEED.
(D) (1) A PERSON WHO VIOLATES SUBSECTION (A) OR (B) OF THIS
SECTION IS GUILTY OF A FELONY AND ON CONVICTION IS SUBJECT TO
IMPRISONMENT NOT EXCEEDING 10 YEARS OR A FINE NOT EXCEEDING $7,500 OR
BOTH.
(2) A PERSON WHO VIOLATES SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION IS
GUILTY OF A MISDEMEANOR AND ON CONVICTION IS SUBJECT TO IMPRISONMENT
NOT EXCEEDING 3 YEARS OR A FINE NOT EXCEEDING $7,500 OR BOTH.
(E) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER PROVISION OF LAW, THE PROSECUTION
OF AN ALLEGED VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION OR FOR AN ALLEGED VIOLATION OF A
CRIME BASED ON AN ACT THAT ESTABLISHES A VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION MAY BE
COMMENCED IN ANY COUNTY IN WHICH:
(1) AN ELEMENT OF THE CRIME OCCURRED;
(2) THE DEED IS RECORDED IN THE COUNTY LAND RECORDS;
(3) THE VICTIM RESIDES; OR
(4) IF THE VICTIM IS NOT AN INDIVIDUAL, THE VICTIM CONDUCTS
BUSINESS.
(F) FINES COLLECTED UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL BE PAID INTO THE
DEED FRAUD PREVENTION GRANT FUND UNDER § 2–802 OF THE PUBLIC SAFETY
ARTICLE.
Article – Public Safety
2–307.

HOUSE BILL 130
(a) (1) The Department shall collect, analyze, and disseminate:
(i) information about the incidence of crime in the State,
INCLUDING DISAGGREGATED INFORMATION ON INCIDENTS OF FRAUD WITH
SPECIFIC INFORMATION ON VIOLATIONS OF § 8–906 OF THE CRIMINAL LAW
ARTICLE; and
(ii) information, including race and sex, on the total number of law
enforcement employees, de–identified and disaggregated by:
1. position for civilian employees; and
2. rank for sworn employees.
(2) Each law enforcement agency shall provide the Department with the
information described in paragraph (1) of this subsection in the format that the Secretary
requires.
(b) (1) The Department shall collect and analyze information about incidents
apparently directed against an individual or group because of race, color, religious beliefs,
sexual orientation, gender, disability, national origin, or homelessness.
(2) Each local law enforcement agency and the State Fire Marshal shall
provide the Department with the information described in paragraph (1) of this subsection.
(3) The Department shall adopt procedures for the collection and analysis
of the information described in paragraph (1) of this subsection.
(4) The Department shall make quarterly reports to the Commission on
Civil Rights about the information described in paragraph (1) of this subsection.
SUBTITLE 8. DEED FRAUD PREVENTION GRANT FUND.
2–801.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “DEED FRAUD” MEANS A VIOLATION OF § 8–906 OF THE CRIMINAL LAW
ARTICLE.
(C) “FUND” MEANS THE DEED FRAUD PREVENTION GRANT FUND.
2–802.

HOUSE BILL 130 7
(A) THERE IS A DEED FRAUD PREVENTION GRANT FUND.
(B) THE PURPOSE OF THE FUND IS TO PROVIDE GRANTS TO:
(1) AID STATE AND LOCAL LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCIES IN
IDENTIFYING AND PREVENTING DEED FRAUD;
(2) SUPPORT LEGAL SERVICES FOR VICTIMS OF DEED FRAUD, IN
COORDINATION WITH THE MARYLAND LEGAL SERVICES CORPORATION; AND
(3) OFFER EMERGENCY HOUSING ASSISTANCE TO DISPLACED
VICTIMS OF DEED FRAUD.
(C) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADMINISTER THE FUND.
(D) THE DEPARTMENT, IN COORDINATION WITH THE MARYLAND LEGAL
SERVICES CORPORATION, MAY ESTABLISH STANDARDS TO DETERMINE ELIGIBILITY
FOR GRANTS UNDER THE FUND.
(E) (1) THE FUND IS A SPECIAL, NONLAPSING FUND THAT IS NOT
SUBJECT TO § 7–302 OF THE STATE FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE.
(2) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL HOLD THE FUND SEPARATELY,
AND THE COMPTROLLER SHALL ACCOUNT FOR THE FUND.
(F) THE FUND CONSISTS OF:
(1) MONEY APPROPRIATED IN THE STATE BUDGET TO THE FUND;
(2) FINES COLLECTED UNDER § 8–906 OF THE CRIMINAL LAW
ARTICLE;
(3) INTEREST EARNINGS; AND
(4) ANY OTHER MONEY FROM ANY OTHER SOURCE ACCEPTED FOR
THE BENEFIT OF THE FUND.
(G) THE FUND MAY BE USED ONLY TO:
(1) CARRY OUT THE PURPOSES OF THIS SUBTITLE; AND

HOUSE BILL 130
(2) PAY FOR THE ADMINISTRATIVE EXPENSES OF OPERATING THE
FUND.
(H) (1) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL INVEST THE MONEY OF THE FUND
IN THE SAME MANNER AS OTHER STATE MONEY MAY BE INVESTED.
(2) ANY INTEREST EARNINGS OF THE FUND SHALL BE CREDITED TO
THE FUND.
(I) EXPENDITURES FROM THE FUND MAY BE MADE ONLY IN ACCORDANCE
WITH THE STATE BUDGET.
(J) MONEY EXPENDED FROM THE FUND IS SUPPLEMENTAL TO AND IS NOT
INTENDED TO TAKE THE PLACE OF FUNDING THAT OTHERWISE WOULD BE
APPROPRIATED FOR DEED FRAUD PREVENTION.
(K) IN FISCAL YEAR 2028, THE GOVERNOR SHALL INCLUDE IN THE ANNUAL
BUDGET BILL AN APPROPRIATION OF $200,000 TO THE FUND.
Article – State Finance and Procurement
6–226.
(a) (2) (i) This paragraph does not apply in fiscal years 2024 through 2028.
(ii) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, and unless
inconsistent with a federal law, grant agreement, or other federal requirement or with the
terms of a gift or settlement agreement, net interest on all State money allocated by the
State Treasurer under this section to special funds or accounts, and otherwise entitled to
receive interest earnings, as accounted for by the Comptroller, shall accrue to the General
Fund of the State.
(iii) The provisions of subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph do not
apply to the following funds:
212. the Department of Social and Economic Mobility Special
Fund; [and]
213. the Population Health Improvement Fund; AND
214. THE DEED FRAUD PREVENTION GRANT FUND.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) There is a Task Force to Study Deed Fraud.

HOUSE BILL 130 9
(b) The Task Force consists of the following members:
(1) the Attorney General, or the Attorney General’s designee one
representative of the Maryland State’s Attorneys’ Association, designated by the President of
the Association;
(2) one representative of the Judiciary, designated by the Chief Justice of
the Supreme Court of Maryland;
(3) the Director of the State Department of Assessments and Taxation, or
the Director’s designee;
(4) the Executive Director of the Maryland Legal Services Corporation, or
the Executive Director’s designee;
(5) the Secretary of Housing and Community Development, or the
Secretary’s designee; and
(6) the following members, appointed by the Governor:
(i) one representative of the land title insurance industry; and
(ii) one individual with experience as a notary public.
(c) The Governor shall designate the chair of the Task Force.
(d) The Administrative Office of the Courts Office of the Attorney General
Department of Legislative Services shall provide staff for the Task Force.
(e) A member of the Task Force:
(1) may not receive compensation as a member of the Task Force; but
(2) is entitled to reimbursement for expenses under the Standard State
Travel Regulations, as provided in the State budget.
(f) The Task Force shall:
(1) study incidents of deed fraud in Maryland, including the number of
deed fraud complaints, the number of resolved deed fraud cases, the amount of restitution
awarded, and geographic and demographic trends;
(2) study how deed fraud is combatted in other states;
(3) identify patterns used by perpetrators of deed fraud and patterns in
demographics of victims of deed fraud;

HOUSE BILL 130
(4) develop recommendations for deed fraud detection tools;
(5) conduct an analysis on victims of deed fraud that identifies the
economic impact on victims; and
(6) make recommendations for combatting deed fraud in the State,
including strategies for intergovernmental coordination to more effectively detect and
prevent deed fraud.
(g) On or before July 1, 2028, the Task Force shall report its findings and
recommendations to the General Assembly in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State
Government Article.
SECTION 3. 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026. Section 2 of this Act It shall remain effective for a period of 2 years and,
at the end of September 30, 2028, Section 2 of this Act, with no further action required by
the General Assembly, shall be abrogated and of no further force and effect.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.